Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.530

Consolidation—Transfer of fire department employees—Notice—Time limitation.

If, as a result of consolidation of two or more cities, or code cities, any employee is laid off who is eligible to transfer to the city fire department pursuant to this section and RCW 35.10.510 and 35.10.520, the city fire department shall notify the employee of the right to so transfer and the employee shall have ninety days to transfer employment to the consolidating city, or code city fire department.

[ 1986 c 254 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Legislative study—1986 c 254 ss 1-3: See note following RCW 35.10.510.